Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.415

Voluntary change to electoral system.

The legislative authority of a code city or town may authorize a change to its electoral system pursuant to RCW 29A.92.040.

[ 2018 c 113 s 207.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—2018 c 113: See RCW 29A.92.005 and 29A.92.900.